Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 2. Juvenile Justice Act
§ 14-6-241.
Expungement of records in juvenile, circuit and municipal courts.

Any person adjudicated delinquent as a result of having committed a delinquent act other than a violent felony as defined by W.S. 6-1-104(a)(xii), under the provisions of this act may petition the court for the expungement of his record in the juvenile court upon reaching the age of majority. Any petition filed under this section shall be verified by the petitioner, served upon and reviewed by the prosecuting attorney, and no order granting expungement shall be issued prior to the expiration of twenty (20) days after service was made. The prosecuting attorney shall file with the court, an objection, if any, to the petition within twenty (20) days after service. If an objection is filed, the court shall set the matter for hearing. If an objection is filed and after investigation the court finds that the petitioner has not been convicted of a felony since adjudication, that no proceeding involving a felony is pending or being instituted against the petitioner and the rehabilitation of the petitioner has been attained to the satisfaction of the court or the prosecuting attorney, it shall order expunged all records in any format including electronic records in the custody of the court or any agency or official, pertaining to the petitioner’s case. If no objection is filed, the court may summarily enter an order if the court finds that the petitioner is otherwise eligible for relief under this subsection. Copies of the order shall be sent to each agency or official named in the order. The prosecuting attorney, to the extent practicable and if the state filed the petition for expungement as authorized by W.S.

7-13-1401

, shall inform the juvenile of the order of expungement and of the practical effects of the expungement. Upon entry of an order the proceedings in the petitioner’s case are deemed never to have occurred and the petitioner may reply accordingly upon any inquiry in the matter.

The record of a minor convicted of a violation of a municipal ordinance may be expunged in the same manner as provided in subsection (a) of this section by petition to the municipal court.

The record of a minor convicted of a misdemeanor in circuit court may be expunged in the same manner as provided in subsection (a) of this section by petition to the circuit court.

The record of a minor admitted to a diversion program or granted a deferral pursuant to Wyoming statute may be expunged in the same manner and subject to the same limitations as provided in subsection (a) of this section by petition to the court ordering the diversion program or deferral.

A record of arrest, charges or disposition of a minor resulting in dismissal, declined prosecution or otherwise not resulting in a conviction or an adjudication of delinquency or an adjudication of being a child in need of supervision may be expunged in the same manner and subject to the same limitations as provided in subsection (a) of this section by petition to the court.

For purposes of this section, “expungement” means to permanently destroy or delete all records, including physical and electronic records, documents and images of documents. If a minor’s name appears on a court list, index or other compilation containing other information not subject to expungement, “expungement” means to redact by obliterating the minor’s name from the record.

After an order of expungement issued under this section, no record of the minor’s identification may be retained by any law enforcement agency, the juvenile court, or by any municipal court, circuit court or any state agency or department except as follows:

An agency may retain records to comply with federal reporting requirements. Records kept under this paragraph shall not be otherwise disclosed or released except for the federal reporting purposes and shall be expunged within ten (10) years of the completion of the initial court case;

Expungement of electronic records in a backup database may be completed upon restoration of the backup database, provided that the backup database is not accessible until restored. Any law enforcement agency, court or state agency subject to this paragraph shall implement policies and procedures to ensure expungement of records following restoration of a backup database.

The state or municipality may petition the court for the expungement of a record in the juvenile court, circuit court or municipal court pursuant to subsections (a) through (c) of this section, upon the person who was adjudicated delinquent or convicted reaching the age of majority.

No filing fee shall be required for a petition for the expungement of a juvenile record under this section.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 42; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.42; Laws 1973, ch. 225, § 2; 1975, ch. 186, § 1; 1976, ch. 3, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-142; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1995, ch. 154, § 1; 1997, ch. 53, § 1; ch. 199, § 2; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2019 ch. 29, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to rights of victims to be informed during delinquency proceedings, see §

14-6-503

.

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, rewrote (a), which read: “Any person adjudicated delinquent as a result of having committed a delinquent act other than a violent felony as defined by W.S. 6-1-104(a)(xii), under the provisions of this act may petition the court for the expungement of his record in the juvenile court upon reaching the age of majority. If after investigation the court finds that the petitioner has not been convicted of a felony since adjudication, that no proceeding involving a felony is pending or being instituted against the petitioner and the rehabilitation of the petitioner has been attained to the satisfaction of the court or the prosecuting attorney, it shall order expunged all records in the custody of the court or any agency or official, pertaining to the petitioner's case. Copies of the order shall be sent to each agency or official named in the order. Upon entry of an order the proceedings in the petitioner's case are deemed never to have occurred and the petitioner may reply accordingly upon any inquiry in the matter.”; in (b), inserted “minor convicted of a” preceding “violation of,” inserted “a” following “violation of,” and substituted “ordinance” for “ordinances”; and added (d) through (j).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Cited

in

AMB v. State, 892 P.2d 799,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 1995); McAdams v. State, 907 P.2d 1302,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 220

(Wyo. 1995); Johnson v. State, 971 P.2d 973,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1998).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Prosecution as a Juvenile or an Adult? Is the Discretion Vested in the District Attorney by Section 14-6-203(c) of the Wyoming Statutes Unconstitutional and Violative of the Proper Role of a Prosecutor?” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Expungement of juvenile court records, 71 ALR3d 753.

Expunction of federal arrest records in absence of conviction, 97 ALR Fed 652.

Effect of expungement of conviction on § 241(a)(4), (11) of Immigration and Nationality Act of 1952 (8 USC § 1251(a)(4), (11) [now see 8 USC § 1227]), making aliens deportable for crimes involving moral turpitude or drugs, 98 ALR Fed 750.

§ 14-6-242.
Liability for contempt; penalties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court upon its own motion or upon the motion of the district or county attorney, or guardian ad litem, may find that the child, child’s parent, parents, or guardian or any other person who willfully violates, or neglects or refuses to obey or perform any order or provision of this act is liable for contempt of court and may be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or incarcerated not more than ninety (90) days, or both.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 43; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.43; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-143; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1995, ch. 202, § 2; 1996, ch. 106, § 1; 1997, ch. 199, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to criminal contempt, see Rule 42, W.R. Cr. P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Burden of proof. —

The burden of proof for the “willfulness” element of the crime of criminal contempt under this section rests on the state. ELR v. State, 902 P.2d 696,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1995).

Quoted

in

ELR v. State, 902 P.2d 696,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1995).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Interference with enforcement of order in juvenile delinquent case as contempt, 8 ALR3d 657.

§ 14-6-243.
Separate docket for juvenile cases; availability of records for statistics.

The clerk of the court shall maintain a separate docket for juvenile cases and record therein the case number, the offense charged, the age of the child involved and the disposition made. The records shall be made available for statistical purposes provided the names of the offenders are not revealed unless the offender was adjudicated delinquent for commission of a violent felony as defined by W.S. 6-1-104(a)(xii).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 44; W.S. 1957, § 14-115.44; W.S. 1977, § 14-8-144; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1997, ch. 28, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to grounds for denying right of inspection of public records generally, see §

16-4-203

.

Quoted

in

Mullin v. State, 505 P.2d 305,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1973).

§ 14-6-244.
Parental liability for failure to exercise reasonable control and authority.

A parent or guardian having custody of a child shall exercise such parental control and authority over the child as is reasonably necessary to prevent the child from engaging in delinquent acts.

If the court finds at the hearing of a juvenile petition that the parent or guardian having custody of the child has failed or neglected to subject the juvenile to reasonable parental control and authority, and that such failure or neglect is the proximate cause of the act or acts of the juvenile upon which a finding of delinquency is based, the court may, if the child is placed on probation, require the parent or guardian to furnish a cash deposit or bond in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00), conditioned upon the faithful discharge of the conditions of the child’s probation.

The court may declare all or part of a cash deposit or bond posted under subsection (b) of this section forfeited if:

The juvenile commits a subsequent delinquent act or is found to be in contempt of court or to have violated the terms of his probation; and

The court, after hearing, finds that the child’s act was proximately caused by the failure or neglect of the parent or guardian to subject the juvenile to reasonable parental control and authority, including, but not limited to, enforcement of curfew, home detention, school attendance, or other conditions of probation.

Funds received upon forfeiture of a cash deposit or bond under subsection (c) of this section shall be applied in payment of damages, if any, which may have been caused by the juvenile. The balance of the proceeds shall be retained by the court to apply to any future damages resulting from the act or acts of the juvenile until the juvenile reaches eighteen (18) years of age at which time any remaining proceeds shall be returned to the parent or guardian.

The provisions of this section as it relates to the failure or neglect of a parent or guardian to subject a child to reasonable parental control and authority, are in addition to and not in substitution for any other requirements of law. The provisions of this section shall not apply to foster parents.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 202, § 1.

§ 14-6-245.
Progressive sanction guidelines.

The purpose of the progressive sanctions guidelines authorized by W.S.

14-6-245

through

14-6-252

are to:

Ensure that juvenile offenders face uniform and consistent consequences and punishments that correspond to the seriousness of each offender’s current offense, prior delinquent history, special treatment or training needs and effectiveness of prior interventions;

Balance public protection and rehabilitation while holding juvenile offenders accountable;

Permit flexibility in the decisions made in relation to the juvenile offender to the extent allowed by law;

Consider the juvenile offender’s circumstances; and

Improve juvenile justice planning and resource allocation by ensuring uniform and consistent reporting of disposition decisions at all levels.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 119, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Application of guidelines not mandatory. —

The statute does not make application of the progressive sanctions guidelines and imposition of sanction levels or sanctions delineated in §§

14-6-246

through

14-6-252

mandatory. WJH v. State, 2001 WY 54, 24 P.3d 1147,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2001).

Cited

in

Ct v. State, 2006 WY 101, 140 P.3d 643,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(2006).

§ 14-6-246.
Sanction levels.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, when a child is adjudicated as a delinquent the juvenile court may, in a disposition hearing, assign the child one (1) of the following sanction levels according to the child’s conduct:

For a misdemeanor punishable under the Wyoming Criminal Code by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, the sanction level is one;

For a misdemeanor punishable under the Wyoming Criminal Code by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, the sanction level is two;

For a felony, other than a violent felony as defined by W.S. 6-1-104(a)(xii), the sanction level is three;

For a violent felony as defined by W.S. 6-1-104(a)(xii), other than a felony punishable by life, life without parole or death, the sanction level is four;

For a felony punishable under the Wyoming Criminal Code by life, life without parole or death, the sanction level is five.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, if the child’s subsequent adjudication of delinquent conduct involves a violation of the Wyoming Criminal Code that is the same level of seriousness as the child’s previous conduct, the juvenile court may assign the child a sanction level that is one (1) level higher than the previously assigned sanction level, unless the child’s previously assigned sanction level is five.

If the court determines that a child assigned a sanction level of one through four has violated a condition imposed under that sanction level, the court shall conduct a new disposition hearing and may assign the child a sanction level that is one (1) level higher than the previously assigned sanction level.

If the juvenile court deviates from the guidelines under this section it shall state in writing its reasons for the deviation and enter the statement into the record. Nothing in W.S.

14-6-245

through

14-6-252

prohibits the imposition of appropriate sanctions that are different from those provided at any sanction level.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 119, § 1.

Catchall provision. —

Subsection (d) constitutes a catchall provision and permits the court to customize dispositional orders to the unique characteristics of individual children, in light of both their personal circumstances and the nature of their delinquent behavior. WJH v. State, 2001 WY 54, 24 P.3d 1147,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2001).

Requirement for deviation. —

The sole qualification to the juvenile court's broad sanction authority is that, in the event of deviation from the progressive sanctions guidelines, the court must state its reasons in writing and enter the statement into the record. WJH v. State, 2001 WY 54, 24 P.3d 1147,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2001).

Dispositional order entered in a juvenile case relating to felony property was reversed and remanded because a predisposition report was not completed or reviewed. Moreover, the trial court failed to follow the particular sanction levels, and no reasons were given in writing for the failure to do so.
CT v. State (In re CT), 2006 WY 101, 140 P.3d 643,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 2006).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Treatment, under Federal Juvenile Delinquency Act (18 USC §§ 5031-5042), of juvenile alleged to have violated law of United States, 137 ALR Fed 481.

§ 14-6-247.
Sanctions common to all levels.

For a child at any sanction level, the juvenile court may:

Transfer temporary legal custody to a relative, other suitable adult, state agency or local public agency the court finds qualified to receive and care for the child, subject to terms and conditions prescribed by the court;

Commit the child to a suitable certified hospital willing to accept the child for not more than ninety (90) days for treatment for substance abuse or for specialized treatment and rehabilitation programs conducted especially for juveniles;

Commit the child to a juvenile detention facility for not more than six (6) months, if the adjudicated delinquent has attained the age of twelve (12) years;

Require the delinquent to participate in a teen court program pursuant to W.S.

7-13-1205

;

Require the child and his parents or guardian to make restitution for any damage or loss caused by the child’s wrongful act, except that the liability of the parent or guardian shall not exceed the limit established by W.S.

14-2-203

;

Impose a fine within the limits of law for an offense or misconduct by the child where a fine might be imposed by another court in this state having jurisdiction thereof. Fines shall be paid to the clerk of court for deposit to the public school fund of the county in which the fine was assessed as provided by law;

Require a child, within the limits of applicable laws and regulations governing child labor, to perform a designated number of hours of community service, to participate in a work program or to perform labor or services under the supervision of a responsible adult designated by the court. Any order shall enable the child to meet the obligations imposed pursuant to this act or for the purpose of discipline and rehabilitation when deemed necessary or desirable by the court;

Order the child to be examined or treated by a physician, surgeon, psychiatrist or psychologist or to obtain other specialized treatment, care, counseling or training, and place the child in a hospital or medical facility, youth camp, school or other suitable facility for treatment;

Restrict or restrain the child’s driving privileges for a period of time the court deems appropriate. If necessary to enforce the restrictions, the court may take possession of the child’s driver’s license;

Impose any demands, requirements, limitations, restrictions or restraints on the child, and do all things with regard to the child that his parents might reasonably and lawfully do under similar circumstances;

Order the child, his parents, or the guardian, to undergo evaluation and indicated treatment or another program designed to address problems which contributed to the adjudication. A parent or guardian who willfully violates or neglects or refuses to comply with any order of the court may be found in contempt and punished as provided by W.S.

14-6-242

;

After notice to appear, order the child’s custodial and noncustodial parent or guardian to participate in the child’s treatment or plan of supervision or probation, or otherwise order the performance of any acts which are reasonably necessary to aid the juvenile in completion of court ordered obligations;

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, impose any one (1) or more of the following requirements upon the child’s parents or guardian if the court, after hearing, finds that the child’s act was proximately caused by the failure or neglect of the parent or guardian to subject the child to reasonable parental control and authority:

Order the child’s parents or guardian to pay all or part of any fine imposed under paragraph (vi) of this subsection;

Require the child’s parents or guardian to perform community service with the child;

Require the child’s parents or guardian to attend parenting classes or other appropriate education or treatment program at their own expense.

Require the child or the child’s parents or guardian and the child to participate in a court supervised treatment program qualified under W.S.

7-13-1601

through

7-13-1615

, provided the court supervised treatment program accepts the child’s parents or guardian and the child for participation in its program.

In any proceeding to impose requirements under paragraph (a)(xiii) of this section, the child’s parents or guardian may raise as an affirmative defense that they have made a good faith effort to prevent the child from engaging in delinquent conduct or engaging in conduct indicating a need for supervision and that, despite their efforts, the child continues to engage in such conduct.

For a child at any sanction level, the juvenile court shall inform the child of the progressive sanctions that may be imposed on the child if the child continues to engage in delinquent conduct.

If the juvenile court places the child on probation at any sanction level, the juvenile court shall discharge the child from the custody of the probation department on the date the provisions of this section are met or on the child’s twenty-first birthday, whichever is earlier.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 119, § 1; 2009, ch. 145, § 2; 2013 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(xiv).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a)(ii), added “suitable” and deleted “or the Wyoming state hospital” after “child.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 14-6-201(a)(xxvi).

Failure to assign specific sanction level. —

A juvenile court is not constrained to the sanctions detailed in subsection (a) where it fails to assign a specific sanction level. WJH v. State, 2001 WY 54, 24 P.3d 1147,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2001).

Information given to juvenile. —

Although a court must advise the juvenile of the potential for progressively more serious sanctions, it is not required to read the sanction statutes to the juvenile verbatim in order to satisfy the requirement. WJH v. State, 2001 WY 54, 24 P.3d 1147,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2001).

Evidence sufficient to order restitution. —

Based on the circumstantial evidence that the damage to a garage door was not present before the victim left for the weekend, juvenile's admission to breaking into the garage, and an estimate for repairing the garage door, the juvenile court did not abuse its discretion in ordering restitution. TPJ v. State, 2003 WY 49, 66 P.3d 710,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2003).

Restitution amount. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-6-247(a)(v) limits the amount of restitution a juvenile can be required to pay to damages or losses caused by the juvenile's wrongful act and does not extend to reimbursement of security devices added by the victim after the commission of the crime that would have benefited the victim in the future. TPJ v. State, 2003 WY 49, 66 P.3d 710,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 14-6-248.
Sanction level one.

For a child at sanction level one, the juvenile court may:

Place the child on probation for not less than three (3) months nor more than six (6) months;

Require the child’s parents or guardians to identify restrictions the parents or guardians shall impose on the child’s activities and requirements the parents or guardians shall set for the child’s behavior;

Refer the child to a community-based youth intervention program designated by the court;

Impose any other sanction or condition listed by W.S.

14-6-247

.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 119, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited

in

WJH v. State, 2001 WY 54, 24 P.3d 1147,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2001).

§ 14-6-249.
Sanction level two.

For a child at sanction level two, the juvenile court may:

Place the child on probation for not less than six (6) months;

Impose specific restrictions on the child’s activities and requirements on the child’s behavior as conditions of probation;

Require a probation officer to closely monitor the child’s activities and behavior;

Impose any other sanction or condition listed by W.S.

14-6-247

.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 119, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 14-6-250.
Sanction level three.

For a child at sanction level three, the juvenile court may:

Require the child to participate as a condition of probation for not less than three (3) months in a highly intensive and regimented residential program, operated by the department or by a private entity, that emphasizes discipline, physical fitness, social responsibility and productive work;

After release from the program described by paragraph (i) of this subsection, continue the child on probation supervision for not less than six (6) months nor more than twelve (12) months;

Impose highly structured restrictions on the child’s activities and requirements for behavior of the child as conditions of probation;

Require a probation officer to closely monitor the child;

Impose any other sanction or condition listed by W.S.

14-6-247

.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 119, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Failure to follow sanction level warranted reversal. —

Dispositional order entered in a juvenile case relating to felony property was reversed and remanded because a predisposition report was not completed or reviewed. Moreover, the trial court failed to follow the particular sanction levels, and no reasons were given in writing for the failure to do so.
CT v. State (In re CT), 2006 WY 101, 140 P.3d 643,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 2006).

§ 14-6-251.
Sanction level four.

For a child at sanction level four, the juvenile court may:

Commit a child who has attained the age of twelve (12) years to the Wyoming boys’ school or the Wyoming girls’ school for an indefinite term, provided:

On release of the child from the Wyoming boys’ school or the Wyoming girls’ school, the juvenile court may:

Impose highly structured restrictions on the child’s activities and requirements for behavior of the child as conditions of release under supervision;

Require a probation officer to closely monitor the child for not less than six (6) months; and

Impose any other appropriate conditions of supervision.

Impose any other sanction or condition listed by W.S.

14-6-247

.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 119, § 1; 2014 ch. 75, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a)(i)(A)(intro), substituted “the juvenile court may” for the department may.”

Laws 2014, ch. 75, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(i)(B) or subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 14-6-252.
Sanction level five.

For a child at sanction level five, the juvenile court may:

Commit a child who has attained the age of twelve (12) years to the Wyoming boys’ school or the Wyoming girls’ school for an indefinite term, provided:

On release of the child from the Wyoming boys’ school or the Wyoming girls’ school, the juvenile court may:

Impose highly structured restrictions on the child’s activities and requirements for behavior of the child as conditions of release under supervision;

Require a probation officer to closely monitor the child for not less than twelve (12) months; and

Impose any other appropriate conditions of supervision.

Impose any other sanction or condition listed by W.S.

14-6-247

.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 119, § 1; 2014 ch. 75, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(i)(B) or subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

The 2014 amendment,

in (a)(i)(A)(intro), substituted “juvenile court” for “department.”

Laws 2014, ch. 75, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

Cited in

RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014).